Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.040

Candidates for examination—Application—Eligibility—Student midwife permits—License extensions.

(1) Any person seeking to be examined shall present to the secretary, at least 45 days before the commencement of the examination, a written application on a form or forms provided by the secretary setting forth under affidavit such information as the secretary may require and proof the candidate has received a high school degree or its equivalent; that the candidate is 21 years of age or older; that the candidate has received a certificate or diploma from a midwifery program accredited by the secretary and licensed under chapter 28C.10 RCW, when applicable, or a certificate or diploma in a foreign institution on midwifery of equal requirements conferring the full right to practice midwifery in the country in which it was issued. The diploma must bear the seal of the institution from which the applicant graduated. Foreign candidates must present with the application a translation of the foreign certificate or diploma.

(2) The candidate shall meet the following conditions:

(a) Obtaining a minimum period of midwifery training for at least three years including the study of the basic nursing skills that the department shall prescribe by rule. However, if the applicant is a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW, or has had previous nursing education or practical midwifery experience, the required period of training may be reduced depending upon the extent of the candidate's qualifications as determined under rules adopted by the department. In no case shall the training be reduced to a period of less than two years.

(b) Meeting minimum educational requirements which shall include studying midwifery; obstetrics; neonatal pediatrics; basic sciences; reproductive anatomy and physiology; behavioral sciences; childbirth education; community care; obstetrical pharmacology; epidemiology; gynecology; family planning; genetics; embryology; neonatology; the medical and legal aspects of midwifery; nutrition during pregnancy and lactation; lactation; nursing skills, including but not limited to injections, administering intravenous fluids, catheterization, and aseptic technique; and such other requirements prescribed by rule.

(c) For a student midwife during training, undertaking the care of not less than 50 individuals in each of the prenatal, intrapartum, and early postpartum periods, but the same individuals need not be seen through all three periods. A student midwife may be issued a permit upon the satisfactory completion of the requirements in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection and the satisfactory completion of the licensure examination required by RCW 18.50.060. The permit permits the student midwife to practice under the supervision of a midwife licensed under this chapter, a physician, or a certified nurse-midwife licensed under the authority of chapter 18.79 RCW. The permit shall expire within one year of issuance and may be extended as provided by rule.

(d) Observing an additional 50 individuals in the intrapartum period before the candidate qualifies for a license.

(e) For candidates seeking a limited prescriptive license extension, completion of additional study and training requirements as prescribed by the department, in collaboration with the Washington medical commission and the midwifery advisory committee, in rule. Such rules shall provide requirements for:

(i) The number of additional obstetrical pharmacology training hours consistent with the training hours required for other similar prescribers; and

(ii) Additional training consistent with guidelines commensurate with other professions providing family planning and treating common prenatal and postpartum conditions and any other relevant sources.

(f) For candidates seeking a licensing extension to include medical devices and implants, completion of the requirements listed in (e) of this subsection and additional study and training requirements as prescribed by the department, in collaboration with the Washington medical commission and the midwifery advisory committee, in rule. Such rules shall provide requirements for:

(i) The minimum number of completed procedures under supervision;

(ii) Completing trainings as required by the device manufacturers or an equivalent; and

(iii) Additional training consistent with guidelines commensurate with other professions providing family planning and treating common prenatal and postpartum conditions and any other relevant sources.

(g) The license extensions referenced in (e) and (f) of this subsection do not apply to newborn care.

(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the department shall adopt rules to provide credit toward the educational requirements for licensure before July 1, 1988, of midwives who are not licensed in Washington, including rules to provide:

(a) Credit toward licensure for documented deliveries;

(b) The substitution of relevant experience for classroom time; and

(c) That experienced lay midwives may sit for the licensing examination without completing the required coursework.

The training required under this section shall include training in any birth setting with particular emphasis on learning the ability to differentiate between low-risk and high-risk pregnancies.

[ 2022 c 289 s 3; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 705; 1991 c 3 s 106; 1987 c 467 s 3; 1986 c 299 s 24; 1981 c 53 s 6; 1917 c 160 s 2; RRS s 10175.]

NOTES:

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.

Effective date—1986 c 299: See RCW 28C.10.902.

Effective date—1981 c 53: See note following RCW 18.50.005.